Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Chapter 15 Civil Air Patrol

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 66, § 1, enacted a new chapter 15 in title 19 and Laws 2004, ch. 107, § 1, enacted a new §

19-15-101

. The provision added by Laws 2004, ch. 107, has been redesignated as §

19-16-101

with the chapter 16 heading “Emergency Search and Rescue” by the legislative service office.

Laws 2004, ch. 66, § 3, provides that all supplies and equipment of the civil air patrol owned by the state of Wyoming are transferred to the military department, and all funds dedicated for the purposes of the civil air patrol are transferred from the department of transportation to the military department for the purposes of the act.

Effective date. —

Laws 2004, ch. 66, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.

§ 19-15-101.
Civil air patrol; authorization of expenditure of state funds.

The department may expend state funds for the purchase of:

Civil air patrol aviation education training aids;

Books and equipment;

Maintenance and hangar rents of “on-loan” United States air force aircraft; and

Maintenance supplies and equipment for a communications network for the civil air patrol.

The department may expend state funds for administrative costs of the civil air patrol.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 66, § 1; 2005, ch. 32, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (b).

§ 19-15-102.
Approval of purchase order.

No expenditure of state funds shall be made unless a purchase order is approved by the department. Funds are under the control of the department.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 66, § 1.

§ 19-15-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 32, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 2004, ch. 66, § 1, limited expenditures under the chapter. See now § 19-15-101(b).

Laws 2005, ch. 32, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.